District of Columbia statutes.
4-753.01a

Housing First Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Housing First Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used to provide vulnerable families and individuals who are homeless with supportive services and housing assistance. The Fund shall be administered by the Department of Human Services in concert with a memorandum of understanding with the Department of Housing and Community Development for facility development and acquisition services.

(b)

(1)

The Fund shall be comprised of monies appropriated into the Fund, including grants, and revenue generated from the disposition or long-term lease of certain real property assets designated by the Mayor.

(2)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in § 4-753.01(b)(4) without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 7a
as added Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5004(a), 55 DCR 7598

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7313, see § 7016(aa)(1) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-61, § 7315, see § 7016(aa)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5050 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle F of title V of the act may be cited as the “Human Services Reporting Requirements Act of 2009”.

Section 7311 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle EE of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Internet Sales Tax, Homelessness Prevention, and WMATA Momentum Fund Establishment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 5051 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided: “Sec. 5051. Housing First report. ”By January 30, 2010, the District of Columbia Auditor shall submit to the Council a financial impact report measuring the government-wide savings produced by the District’s Housing First Program, including in emergency services, physical and mental health services, substance abuse services, personal safety, police services, and incarceration.”

Section 7313 of D.C. Law 20-61, applicable pursuant to D.C. Law 20-61, § 7315, provided that fifty percent of the revenue from the automated traffic enforcement program, to the extent that the revenue is offset by revenue from a tax on sales made via the Internet imposed by Chapter 39A of Title 47 [§ 47-3931 et seq.], and the interest earned on that revenue, but not to exceed $50 million in a fiscal year, shall be dedicated to the End Homelessness Fund established in § 1-325.261.

Section 7315 of Law 20-155 provided that this subtitle shall apply as of the effective date of the Marketplace Fairness Act of 2013, passed by the Senate on May 6, 2013 (S. 743).

Section 7313 of D.C. Law 20-61 was repealed by D.C. Law 21-36, § 7023(a).

Section 7315 of D.C. Law 20-61, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, § 7023(c), provided that §§ 7311 through 7315 of the act shall apply as of the effective date of federal legislation or judicial action that permits the District to impose a sales tax on sales over the Internet.